Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 12. Special Education Service Agency.

Sec. 14.30.600.
Agency established.

There is established, as a public organization, the special education service agency.

History.

(§ 2 ch 112 SLA 1986)

Sec. 14.30.610.
Governing board.

The agency shall be governed by the Governor’s Council on Disabilities and Special Education (AS

47.80.030

).

History.

(§ 2 ch 112 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, under § 6, ch. 13, SLA 1992, and AS

01.05.031

, “Governor’s Council on Disabilities and Special Education” was substituted for “Governor’s Council for the Handicapped and Gifted.”

Sec. 14.30.620.
Employees.

Employees of the agency are not in the state service and are not subject to AS 39.25 (State Personnel Act). However, employees of the agency shall be members of either the Teachers’ Retirement System (AS 14.25) or the Public Employees’ Retirement System (AS 39.35).

History.

(§ 2 ch 112 SLA 1986)

Sec. 14.30.630.
Powers and duties.

The agency may

receive and expend public and private funds to carry out the purposes of the agency;

contract with the department and other public or private agencies for the provision of special education or related services;

do whatever is necessary to carry out the purposes of AS

14.30.600

—

14.30.660

.

The agency shall

provide special education services including

itinerant outreach services to students who are deaf, deaf-blind, intellectually disabled, developmentally disabled, hearing impaired, blind and visually impaired, orthopedically disabled, health-impaired in other ways, and severely emotionally disturbed, and to students with multiple disabilities;

special education instructional support and training of local school district special education personnel; and

other services appropriate to special education needs;

provide for an annual audit of the agency;

provide the department with a two-year plan of operation including a description of the services to be offered by the agency, the method by which the services will be evaluated, information on the number of students and school district personnel to be served, a schedule of funds available to the agency from all sources, and other information that may be required by the department by regulation;

present an annual budget to the department.

History.

(§ 2 ch 112 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 25 SLA 2006; am § 4 ch 42 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2006 amendment, effective May 10, 2006, inserted “students who are” near the beginning of subparagraph (b)(1)(A), and substituted “disabled, health-impaired in other ways, and severely emotionally disturbed, and to students with multiple disabilities” for “handicapped, other health-impaired, severely emotionally disturbed, and multi-handicapped students” in that subparagraph.

The 2013 amendment, effective September 1, 2013, in (b)(1)(A), substituted “intellectually disabled, developmentally disabled” for “mentally retarded”.

Sec. 14.30.640.
Eligibility for service.

The services of the agency shall be available to school districts that serve children whose special education needs occur infrequently, who require specialized services not normally available in the school district, and who cannot be easily served by local school district personnel because of the low number of students in the district in need of the particular service. The agency may provide services to a child with a disability, as that term is defined in AS

14.30.350

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 112 SLA 1986; am § 36 ch 67 SLA 2001)

Sec. 14.30.650.
Funding.

Each fiscal year, the department shall allocate to the agency not less than $23.13 times the number of students in the state in average daily membership in the preceding fiscal year as determined under AS

14.17.600

. Money to carry out the provisions of this section may be appropriated annually by the legislature. If amounts are insufficient to meet the allocation authorized under this section for a fiscal year, the allocation shall be reduced pro rata.

History.

(§ 2 ch 112 SLA 1986; am § 31 ch 83 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 2013; am § 1 ch 12 SLA 2021)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective May 30, 2013, in the first sentence substituted “$18.65” for “$15.75”, and deleted the last sentence, which read, “The amount allocated to the agency shall be reduced each fiscal year by the amount contributed by the department to the teachers’ retirement system (AS 14.25) or the public employees’ retirement system (AS 39.35) on behalf of employees of the agency.”

The 2021 amendment, effective July 1, 2021, in the first sentence, substituted “$23.13” for “$18.65” following “not less than.”

Legislative history reports. —

For legislative letter of intent relating to the amendment of this section by sec. 1, ch. 23, SLA 2013 (CCS HB 87), see 2013 House Journal 348 — 349.

Sec. 14.30.660.
Definition.

In AS

14.30.600

—

14.30.660

, unless the context otherwise requires, “agency” means the special education service agency.

History.

(§ 2 ch 112 SLA 1986)